Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 343.961 is amended to read:
343.961. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Day treatment program” means a  public or private program that provides treatment of
children with a mental illness, an emotional disturbance or another mental health issue.
(b) “Eligible day treatment program” means a  day treatment program with which the Oregon
Health Authority contracts for long term care or treatment. “Eligible day treatment  program” does
not include residential treatment programs or programs that provide care or treatment to juveniles
who are in detention facilities.
(c)(A) “Eligible residential treatment program” means :
(i) A residential treatment  program with which the Oregon Health Authority, the Department
of Human Services or the Oregon Youth Authority contracts for long term care or treatment.
(ii) A residential program that provides disability-related supports under  a license issued
by the Department of Human Services under ORS 443.410 and that:
(I) Was licensed by the Department of Human Services on the effective date of this  2021
Act and maintains that license as a valid license; and
(II) Has  students being provided education by a school district that received moneys un-
der this section for the 2020-2021  school year and that has an average daily membership, as
defined in ORS 327.006, of 15,000 or less.
(B) “Eligible residential treatment program” does not include psychiatric  day treatment pro-
grams or programs that provide care or treatment to juveniles who are in detention facilities.
(d) “Residential treatment program” means a public or private  residential program that provides
treatment of children with a mental illness, an emotional disturbance or another mental health issue.
(e) “Student” means a child who is placed in an eligible  day treatment program or eligible res-
idential treatment program by a public or private entity or by the child’s parent.
(2) The Department of Education shall provide moneys for payment of the costs of education of
students in eligible day treatment programs and eligible  residential treatment programs as provided
by ORS 327.023. Payment shall be made to the school district in which  the eligible day treatment
program or eligible residential treatment program is located. The costs of education  do not include
transportation, care, treatment or medical expenses.
Enrolled House Bill 3254 (HB 3254-B) Page 1
(3)(a) The school district in which an eligible day treatment program or eligible residential
treatment program is located is responsible for providing the education of a student, including the
identification, location and evaluation of the student for  the purpose of determining the student’s
eligibility to receive special education and related services.
(b) A school district  that is responsible for providing an education under this subsection may
provide the education:
(A) Directly or through another school district or an education service district; and
(B) In the  facilities of an eligible day treatment program , [ or] an eligible residential treatment
program, [ the facilities of ] a school district or [ the facilities of ] an education service district , except
that an eligible residential treatment program described in subsection (1)(c)(A)(ii) of this
section may not provide education in the facilities of the program .
(c) When a student is no longer in an eligible day treatment program  or eligible residential
treatment program, the responsibilities imposed by this subsection terminate and become the re-
sponsibilities of the school district where  the student is a resident, as determined under ORS 339.133
and 339.134.
(4) The school district where  the student is a resident is responsible for providing transportation
to a student enrolled in an eligible day treatment program. Transportation must be  provided by the
school district where the  student is a resident each day the student is scheduled to receive services
from the eligible day treatment program.
(5) A school district may request the Department of Education to directly make payments  to
another school district or an education  service district for eligible day treatment programs or eli-
gible residential treatment programs when education is provided by the other school district or  the
education service district. Payments made under this subsection do not affect any responsibilities
described in subsection (3) of this section for the school district that made the request.
(6) The Oregon Health Authority, the Department of Human Services or the Oregon  Youth Au-
thority shall give the  school district providing the education at an eligible day treatment program
or an eligible residential treatment program 14 days’  notice, to the extent practicable, before a
student is dismissed from the program.
(7) The Department of  Education may make advances to school districts responsible for provid-
ing an education to students under this section from funds appropriated for that purpose based  on
the estimated agreed cost of educating the students per school year. Advances equal to  25 percent
of the estimated cost  may be made on September 1, December 1 and March 1 of the current year.
The balance may be paid whenever the full determination of cost is made.
(8) School districts  that provide the education described in this section on a year-round plan
may apply for 25 percent of the funds appropriated for that purpose on  July 1, October 1, January
1, and 15 percent on April 1.  The balance may be paid whenever the full determination of cost is
made.
(9) In addition  to the payment methods described in this section, the Department of Education
may negotiate intergovernmental agreements to pay for the cost of education in day treatment pro-
grams and residential treatment programs operated under the  auspices of the governing board of a
public university listed in ORS 352.002 or the Oregon  Health and Science University Board of Di-
rectors.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 327.023 is amended to read:
327.023. In addition to those  moneys distributed through the State School Fund, the Department
of Education shall provide from state funds  appropriated therefor, grants in aid or support for spe-
cial and compensatory education programs including:
(1) The Oregon School for the Deaf.
(2) Medicaid match for  administration efforts to secure Medicaid funds for services provided to
children with disabilities.
(3) Hospital programs for education services  to children who are hospitalized for extended pe-
riods of time or who require hospitalization due to severe disabilities as described in ORS 343.261.
Enrolled House Bill 3254 (HB 3254-B) Page 2
(4) Eligible day treatment programs and eligible residential treatment programs  for education
services to children who are in the treatment programs as described in ORS 343.961.
(5) Regional services provided to children  with low-incidence disabling conditions as described
in ORS 343.236.
(6) Early childhood special education provided to preschool  children with disabilities from age
three until  age of eligibility for kindergarten as described in ORS 339.185, 343.035, 343.041, 343.055,
343.065, 343.157 and 343.455 to 343.534.
(7) Early intervention services for preschool children from birth until age three as described in
ORS 339.185, 343.035, 343.041, 343.055, 343.065, 343.157 and 343.455 to 343.534.
(8) Evaluation services for children with disabilities to  determine program eligibility and needs
as described in ORS 343.146.
(9) Education services to children residing at state hospitals.
(10) Disadvantaged children program under ORS 343.680.
(11) Early childhood education under ORS 329.235.
(12) Child development specialist program under ORS 329.255.
(13) Youth care centers under ORS  420.885 that are not within a detention facility, as defined
in ORS 419A.004.
(14) Staff development and mentoring.
(15) Career and technical education grants.
(16) Special science education programs.
(17) Talented and Gifted children program under ORS 343.391 to 343.413.
(18) Pediatric nursing facility programs for educational services provided to students  who are
admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House April 15, 2021
Repassed by House June 3, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 2, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3254 (HB 3254-B) Page 3